Utah statutes.
63H-1-402.   Public meeting to consider and discuss draft project area plan -- Notice -- Adoption of plan.

(1)  The authority board shall hold at least one public meeting to consider and discuss the draft project area plan.

(2)  At least 10 days before holding a public meeting under Subsection (1), the authority board shall give notice of the public meeting to:

(a)  a taxing entity; and

(b)  a municipality that is located within one-half mile of the proposed project area.

(3)  Following consideration and discussion of the project area plan, the board may adopt the draft project area plan as the project area plan.



Amended by Chapter 9, 2010 General Session

